District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

34-2104

Council authorized to establish charges for sanitary sewer service.

Repealed.

May 18, 1954, 68 Stat. 106, ch. 218, title II, § 206
Jan. 22, 1976, D.C. Law 1-42, § 3(f)(4), 22 DCR 6314
repealed pursuant to § 303 of D.C. Law 11-111

History

1981 Ed., § 43-1604.
1973 Ed., § 43-1605.

Prior Codifications

Repeal effective 90 days after meeting of Board: Section 303 of D.C. Law 11-111 repealed this section. However, § 601 of D.C. Law 11-111 provided that title III of the act shall apply 90 days after the initial meeting of the Board established by section 204 of the act.

Editor's Notes